Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 3. Reserves, Loans, Investments, Bank Service Corporations, Practices, and Services.

Sec. 06.05.200.
Reserves against deposits.

A bank shall maintain a reserve fund sufficient to maintain liquidity and meet all reasonable demands of depositors, as provided in regulations adopted by the department.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

If the reserve fund of a bank falls below the amount required by the department to be maintained under this section, the department may prohibit the bank from making any new loans or other investments or paying any dividends until the bank’s reserve fund has been restored to the amount required under this section.

History.

(§ 3.160 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 4 ch 230 SLA 1968; am §§ 9, 10 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 23, 24, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.205.
Loans and extensions of credit.

The total loans and extensions of credit by a state bank to a person outstanding at one time and not fully secured, as determined in a manner consistent with (b) of this section, by collateral having a market value at least equal to the amount of the loan or extension of credit may not exceed 15 percent of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of the state bank.

The total loans and extensions of credit by a state bank to a person outstanding at one time and fully secured by readily marketable collateral having a market value, as determined by reliable and continuously available price quotations, at least equal to the amount of the money outstanding, may not exceed 10 percent of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of the state bank. The limitation in this subsection is separate from and in addition to the limitation contained in (a) of this section.

The limitations contained in (a) and (b) of this section are subject to the following exceptions:

loans or extensions of credit arising from the discount of commercial or business paper evidencing an obligation to the person negotiating it with recourse are not subject to a limitation based on unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;

the purchase of bankers’ acceptances described in AS

06.05.275

and issued by other banks are not subject to a limitation based on unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;

loans or extensions of credit secured by bills of lading, warehouse receipts, or similar documents transferring or securing title to readily marketable staples are subject to a limitation of 35 percent of unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus in addition to the general limitations if the market value of the staples securing each additional loan or extension of credit at all times equals or exceeds 115 percent of the outstanding amount of the loan or extension of credit; in order to be considered under this paragraph, the staples must be fully covered by insurance whenever it is customary to insure those staples;

loans or extensions of credit secured by bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, or treasury bills of the United States or by other such obligations fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States are not subject to a limitation based on unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;

loans or extensions of credit to, or secured by unconditional takeout commitments or guarantees of, any department, agency, bureau, board, commission, or establishment of the United States or a corporation wholly owned directly or indirectly by the United States are not subject to a limitation based on unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;

loans or extensions of credit secured by a segregated deposit account in the lending state bank are not subject to a limitation based on unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;

loans or extensions of credit to a bank or to a receiver, conservator, superintendent of banks, or other agent in charge of the business and property of that bank, if approved by the department, are not subject to a limitation based on unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;

loans or extensions of credit arising from the discount of negotiable or non-negotiable installment consumer paper that carries a full recourse endorsement or unconditional guarantee by the person transferring the paper are subject under this section to a maximum limitation equal to 25 percent of unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus, notwithstanding the collateral requirements set out in (b) of this section; however, if the state bank’s files or the knowledge of its officers of the financial condition of each maker of that consumer paper is reasonably adequate, and an officer of the state bank designated for that purpose by the board of directors of the state bank certifies in writing that the state bank is relying primarily upon the responsibility of each maker for payment of the loans or extensions of credit and not upon any full or partial recourse endorsement or guarantee by the transferor, the limitations of (a) and (b) of this section as to the loans or extensions of credit of each such maker are the sole applicable loan limitations;

loans or extensions of credit secured by shipping documents or instruments transferring or securing title covering livestock or giving a lien on livestock when the market value of the livestock securing the obligation is not at any time less than 115 percent of the face amount of the note covered are subject under this section, notwithstanding the collateral requirements set out in (b) of this section, to a maximum limitation equal to 25 percent of unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;

loans or extensions of credit, arising from the discount by dealers in dairy cattle of paper given in payment for dairy cattle and carrying a full recourse endorsement or unconditional guarantee of the seller, that are secured by the cattle being sold are subject under this section, notwithstanding the collateral requirements set out in (b) of this section, to a maximum limitation equal to 25 percent of unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus.

Except with the written prior approval of the department for an acquisition or merger with another financial institution, or except with the written prior approval of the department in order to prevent loss upon an indebtedness previously contracted in good faith, a state bank may not

accept as security for a loan the capital stock of the state bank;

accept as security for a loan the capital stock of the state bank’s parent holding companies, unless the stock of the holding companies is publicly traded on a nationally recognized exchange; or

loan money that is to be used to purchase the capital stock of the state bank or a parent holding company of the state bank.

The department may adopt regulations to administer and carry out the purposes of this section, including, notwithstanding any contrary provision of this section, regulations to define or further define terms used in this section in order to establish limits or requirements other than those specified in this section for particular classes or categories of loans or extensions of credit.

For purposes of this section, the department may determine when a loan putatively made to a person shall be attributed to another person.

In this section, “person” means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, association, trust, estate, business trust, corporation, or any similar entity or organization.

History.

(§ 3.161 ch 129 SLA 1951; am §§ 5 — 8 ch 230 SLA 1968; am §§ 11, 12 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 25 — 28, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 12 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

11 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks, §§ 989-1000.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 494-509.

Promissory estoppel of lending institution based on promise to lend money. 18 ALR5th 307.

Sec. 06.05.206.
Leasehold and development loans. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.207.
Real estate loans.

A bank may, subject to the requirements of this chapter, make or acquire a loan secured primarily by a first lien on an interest in improved or unimproved real property, including leases, if

the making of the loan is consistent with written lending policies of the bank and regulations adopted by the department;

before the loan is made or acquired, the bank secures and maintains in its files, evidence of merchantable title and a determination of the value of the property by a person familiar with the real property values in the vicinity where the real property is located; and

insurance against loss from fire on all buildings on the real property that are included in the value of the property is acquired by the borrower or the bank and is not allowed to lapse.

A bank may, subject to the requirements of this chapter, make or acquire a loan secured by a junior lien on real property if

payments on the loan secured by all senior liens are current and the bank retains in its records a written report of the status and balance of the senior liens as of the date the junior lien loan is made or acquired; and

all requirements of (a) of this section are met.

In this section, “real property” includes a manufactured home that has become real property under AS

34.85.010

. In this subsection, “manufactured home” has the meaning given in AS

45.29.102

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 230 SLA 1968; am §§ 1, 10 ch 63 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 157 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 1971; am § 29 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.208.
Revolving credit plans. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.209.
Credit cards.

A bank is not prohibited from issuing unsolicited credit cards or other similar credit granting devices but the bank may not hold the customer liable for charges made on a credit card or other device before its acceptance by the customer. Before an unsolicited card is considered accepted by the customer, the customer shall execute and furnish to the bank a written statement of acceptance.

A state bank may issue a credit card or other similar credit granting device to a customer for obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value, and, notwithstanding AS

45.45.010

, the state bank, when credit is extended under this section, may impose a service charge at a monthly rate as agreed upon by contract between the state bank and the customer receiving the credit granting device.

In addition to charges authorized under (b) of this section, a bank may charge an annual fee for the issuance of a credit card or other similar credit granting device.

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 152 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1987; am § 13 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Collateral references. —

Credit card issuer’s liability under state laws for wrongful billing, cancellation, dishonor, or disclosure, 53 ALR4th 231.

Sec. 06.05.210.
Loans to directors, officers, and employees.

Subject to the same terms and conditions applicable to other loans, a director or executive officer of a state bank may borrow up to $100,000, or up to $250,000 for the director’s or executive officer’s primary residence, from the state bank at the discretion of the chief executive or managing officer of the state bank. A loan to a director or executive officer that makes the total amount owed to the state bank by the director or executive officer in excess of the limits in this subsection, or loans of any amount to the chief executive or managing officer of the state bank, shall have the prior approval of the board of directors, shall be reported to the department within 30 days, and shall be secured by adequate collateral.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, loans to directors, executive officers, and other officers and employees of a state bank are subject to the lending limits imposed by AS

06.05.205

and the regulations adopted under that section.

History.

(§ 3.163 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 10 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 13 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 30, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993; am §§ 14, 15 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking § 499.

Sec. 06.05.211.
Loans secured by forest tracts.

A bank may, subject to the requirements of this chapter, make or acquire a loan secured by a first lien on a forest tract if

the making of the loan is consistent with written lending policies of the bank and regulations adopted by the department;

before the loan is made or acquired, the bank secures and maintains in its files evidence of a determination of the value of the property; and

the loan is secured by an amortized mortgage, deed of trust, or assignment of a federal or state timber sale contract.

The aggregate of all loans made or acquired by a bank under this section may not exceed 50 percent of its combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits.

In this section, “forest tract” means a reasonably accessible tract of land primarily covered with marketable or potentially marketable growing timber having a recognized commercial value, which is safeguarded by fire protection, insect, pest, and disease control.

History.

(§ 7 ch 157 SLA 1970; am § 31 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.212.
Overdrafts.

A director, officer, or employee of a state bank may not knowingly, wilfully, and persistently overdraw the director’s, officer’s, or employee’s account or permit a customer to do so.

An overdraft of more than 30 days’ standing may not be allowed as an asset of the bank.

The provisions of this section do not apply to an approved overdraft created under a check guaranty plan or other similar revolving credit plan.

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 1969; am § 3 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 32 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.215.
Liability of directors and officers for certain loans.

A director, executive officer, managing officer, or issuing officer of a state bank who knowingly or with gross negligence approves or permits the funds of the bank to be lent or overdrafts to be made in an unsafe or unsound manner, or in violation of an order of the department, the bank’s lending policies, this title, or a regulation adopted under this title, is personally liable to the bank for all the loans and overdrafts. The bank may enforce the liability against the director or officer by an action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 3.164 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 14 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 33 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 106 et seq., 123 et seq., 500.

Liability of director of bank for losses on bad loans. 11 ALR Fed. 606.

Sec. 06.05.220.
Loans under Title I of the National Housing Act. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.225.
Application of other laws to loans insured under national housing act.

The laws of the state prescribing or limiting interest rates upon loans do not apply to loans insured under 12 U.S.C. 1706c (National Housing Act).

History.

(§ 1.106 C ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 34 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.230.
Investment in property and banking premises.

A bank may acquire, purchase, hold, and convey real and personal property for the following purposes only:

that which is necessary for the convenient transaction of, or the promotion of, its business, including buildings containing banking offices, equipment, furniture and fixtures, art work, leasehold improvements, parking lots, and, with the prior approval of the department, real property reasonably anticipated to be necessary for future expansion of the bank, if the book asset value of the purchase or investment does not exceed 60 percent of the capital and surplus of the bank;

the satisfaction of or on account of debts previously contracted in the course of its business;

the purchase at sale under judgment, decree, lien, or mortgage foreclosure, against security held by it;

that which is necessary in connection with a negatively amortizing loan described under AS

45.45.010(f)

.

History.

(§ 3.166 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 1969; am § 15 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 35 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking § 240.

Sec. 06.05.231.
Bank service corporations.

A bank may invest not more than 10 percent of its paid-in and unimpaired capital and surplus in a bank service corporation if

the bank submits an application requesting permission to invest in a bank service corporation to the department, accompanied by complete information concerning feasibility, rates, and competitive organizations, and the department consents in writing to the investment before it is made; and

the total investment under this section and AS

06.05.230

(1) does not exceed the combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits.

A bank may not employ or use the services of a bank service corporation unless the service corporation provides an adequate bond or insurance against liabilities arising from accounting or other activities performed by the service corporation affecting bank transactions and the bank gives written notice to the department, before any services are rendered, specifying the name and address of the bank service corporation and the nature of the activities to be performed.

The performance of a service for a bank by a bank, person, or organization other than the bank is subject to all laws and regulations governing performance and examination, in the same manner as if the bank were performing the services.

In this section,

“bank service corporation” means a corporation organized to perform bank services for two or more banks, each of which owns part of the capital stock of the corporation;

“bank services” means services for banks such as check and deposit sorting and posting, computation and posting of interest and other credits and charges, preparation and mailing of checks, statements, notices, and similar items, and any clerical, bookkeeping, accounting, statistical, or similar functions performed by a bank for its customers.

History.

(§ 8 ch 157 SLA 1970; am § 36 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988, former subsections (d) and (e) were combined as (d). The terms defined in former subsections (d) and (e) are now defined in (d)(2) and (d)(1), respectively.

Sec. 06.05.232.
Leasing of real and personal property. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.235.
Bank holding companies.

Except as provided in this section or in AS

06.05.570

, it is unlawful for a person to own, control, or hold with power to vote 25 percent or more of a class of voting securities or other capital stock of one or more state banks or domestic bank holding companies subject to regulation under this chapter. However, when it becomes a bona fide necessity to avoid loss for a creditor to accept shares of stock in one or more state banks or domestic bank holding companies constituting more than 25 percent of the ownership or control of a state bank or domestic bank holding company in payment of indebtedness owing to the creditor, shares of stock may be accepted, but the shares of the one or more state banks or domestic bank holding companies exceeding that 25 percent shall be promptly disposed of under the supervision of the department.

A domestic bank holding company that maintains its principal office and place of business in the state and conducts its principal operations in the state, may acquire and own all or a portion of the voting securities or other capital stock of, or all or substantially all of the assets of, one or more banks or bank holding companies. The department may require a domestic bank holding company to post a bond with the department in an amount not more than the paid-in capital and paid-in surplus represented by the proportion of state bank stock directly or indirectly owned, held, or controlled by it, under conditions the department may prescribe, to assure full protection of the public. Before a domestic bank holding company may acquire a bank or bank holding company doing business in the state, the domestic bank holding company shall apply for and obtain a permit from the department. In considering whether to issue a permit, the department shall consider the benefits to the public, the preservation of a competitive banking industry, and the maintenance of a safe and sound bank industry. The domestic bank holding company is subject to an examination by the department or a competent person designated by the department when the department considers it necessary, but not less than once each year. The domestic bank holding company shall pay an examination fee under AS

06.01.010

.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

For the purpose of this section and AS

06.05.570

, a trust company organized under AS 06.26 that is engaged in the business of banking shall be considered a state bank.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

The provisions of this section do not apply to a person that

acquires or holds voting securities or other capital stock of a bank or bank holding company only for a reasonable period of time in connection with the underwriting of securities;

is a state agency;

is a trustee or agent of an independent federal financial regulatory agency; or

under a plan of financial restructuring that is intended to prevent the failure of a state bank and that is approved by the department,

acquires or receives 25 percent or more of a class of voting securities or other capital stock of the bank or bank holding company subject to the plan, and owns, controls, or holds, with the power to vote, the securities acquired or received in excess of 24.99 percent of that class for a period of time that permits the distribution or resale of the securities or other capital stock on a reasonable basis; or

purchases or receives securities under the plan and, after the purchase or receipt, owns, controls, or holds, with a power to vote, less than 25 percent of a class of voting securities or other capital stock of the bank or bank holding company subject to the plan but subsequently, solely through the action or inaction of others, including the bank or bank holding company, owns, controls, or holds, with a power to vote, 25 percent or more of a class of voting securities or other capital stock of the bank or bank holding company; the exemption in this subparagraph does not apply if the department determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing under AS

06.01.030

, that the ownership, control, or holding of the securities or stock exceeding 24.99 percent of a class, other than under a plan to promptly dispose of the securities or stock under the supervision of the department, permits the organization in any manner to control the election of a majority of the board of directors or trustees, or to directly or indirectly exercise a controlling influence over the management or policies of the bank or bank holding company.

History.

(§ 3.167 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 194 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 139 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 1966; am § 18 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 16 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 75 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1983; am §§ 37— 40, 102.ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was reorganized in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.237.
Financial holding companies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

06.05.235

and regulations adopted under that section, a holding company formed under this title may apply to the Federal Reserve System for status as a financial holding company. If the status is granted, the financial holding company has powers as a financial holding company authorized by the Federal Reserve System if

at the time of application, the holding company provides the department with a complete copy of the application;

the holding company provides the department with copies of all correspondence concerning the application;

the holding company provides the department with a copy of the approval by the Federal Reserve System within 10 days after the holding company receives the approval; and

the department does not issue a letter denying financial holding company status within 30 days after the approval by the Federal Reserve System.

History.

(§ 16 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.05.238.
Required directors’ meetings and statements to the department. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.240.
Acquisition of property to satisfy or protect previous loan.

A state bank may take property of any kind to satisfy or protect a loan previously made in good faith and in the ordinary course of business. A bank may not take the capital stock of the bank or of the bank’s parent holding companies unless it complies with AS

06.05.205(d)

. The property shall be entered on the books at cost, or fair market value, whichever is less. Property acquired to satisfy or protect previous loans shall be disposed of over periods of time as the department may prescribe by regulation.

History.

(§ 3.168 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 41 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.245.
Disposition of property not needed in the conduct of a banking business.

All investments in real and personal property, regardless of how acquired, not permitted under AS

06.05.230

that come into the possession of a state bank shall be disposed of as soon as possible. If the real or personal property is not sold within the time limit set by the department in regulations, it shall be written off and may not be carried as an asset of the state bank.

History.

(§ 3.169 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 42 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 17 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.250.
Limitation on cost of banking premises. [Repealed, § 10 ch 63 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 06.05.255.
Borrowing.

The aggregate amount of outstanding liabilities of a state bank for money borrowed exclusive of (1) capital notes and debentures issued under AS

06.05.307

, (2) obligations incurred in connection with the purchase of bank premises under AS

06.05.230

(1), and (3) agreements to repurchase securities, earlier sold by the bank, at the end of a stated period, may not at any time exceed 15 percent of the bank’s total assets, or a larger amount if approved by the department.

Nothing in this section prevents a bank from rediscounting in good faith and endorsing any of its negotiable notes.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 3.171 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 4 ch 63 SLA 1969; am § 18 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 43, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.260.
Pledge, assignment, and transfer of assets.

A bank may not give preference to a depositor or creditor by pledging any of the assets of a bank as collateral security except

to the state to secure state funds, or to a municipal corporation or other public corporation, municipal utility or municipal utility board, or political subdivision of the state to secure its funds, and to the United States as may be required to make the bank a depository for United States funds;

to secure a mortgage or deed of trust in connection with the purchase of banking premises as provided in AS

06.05.230

, if the only property pledged is property purchased in the transaction; or

to a federal reserve bank or federal home loan bank in the manner required by the applicable laws, regulations, and rules of the federal reserve bank or federal home loan bank, as applicable.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

A pledge, assignment, or transfer of any of the assets of a bank in violation of this section is null and void against the creditors of the bank.

History.

(§ 3.172 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 1953; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1969; am §§ 44, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.262.
Assumption of liability.

Except as expressly permitted in this chapter, a state bank may not assume liability as an insurer or as a guarantor or endorser of a security instrument or obligation unless the bank has a property interest in or with respect to the instrument or obligation. This section does not apply to warranty deeds issued by a bank.

History.

(§ 45 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.265.
Liability of directors for certain loans.

A loan in violation of AS

06.05.200

—

06.05.260

makes the officers and directors of the bank jointly and severally liable to the bank for the loan.

History.

(§ 3.162 ch 129 SLA 1951)

Sec. 06.05.270.
Investments and customer securities.

In addition to loans and acquisitions expressly authorized by this chapter, a state bank may deal in, underwrite, and invest in for its own account the obligations that the department by regulation authorizes the bank to deal in, underwrite, or invest in for its own account.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

A state bank may purchase or sell, without recourse, any security upon the order of a customer and for the customer’s account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1968; am §§ 5, 6 ch 56 SLA 1971; am § 19 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 166 SLA 1990; am §§ 3, 4 ch 133 SLA 1992; am §§ 46, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Cross references. —

For orders authorizing Denali State Bank, First Bank, Mt. McKinley Mutual Savings Bank, and Northrim Bank to exercise certain powers under 12 U.S.C. § 24 (Seventh) and (Eleventh) (as amended), see orders 03-07B and 03-08B, available from the division in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development that regulates banking.

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.272.
Bank subsidiaries.

A state bank may purchase or establish, and operate, one or more subsidiaries engaged in any of the following activities, if the subsidiary has the necessary licenses and permits and the operation is not detrimental to the bank’s business:

real property ownership, development, and leasing;

securities brokerage;

other activities authorized in regulations adopted under this section; or

other activities approved by the department.

Under this section, a state bank’s total investment in its subsidiaries may not exceed that which is permissible for a federally chartered bank’s total investment in all subsidiaries as set out in 12 U.S.C. 24a, as amended. Loans to subsidiaries are considered investments subject to the limitations of this subsection.

A subsidiary of a state bank is subject to examination by the department as part of the examination of the bank under AS

06.01.015

.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 75 SLA 2002.]

History.

(§ 47 ch 26 SLA 1993; am §§ 18, 55 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.275.
Trade and bank acceptances.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

A bank may discount, invest in, negotiate, and issue trade acceptances and bank acceptances if

the terms of the draft require presentation for payment within 180 days of issuance, exclusive of days of grace, and it is drawn to finance the purchase of goods with maturity and payment in accordance with the terms of the purchase agreement;

the terms of the draft require presentation for payment within 180 days of issuance, exclusive of days of grace, and it is secured by shipping documents transferring or securing title to goods, or by receipt of a licensed or bonded warehouse securing title to readily marketable goods; or

the draft is drawn by a bank outside the continental limits of the United States for the purpose of furnishing dollar exchange for trade and its terms require presentation for payment within 90 days of issuance.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 10 ch 157 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1990; am §§ 48, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.277.
Providing services as agent.

If a state bank complies with this section and if the department approves the provision of the services under this section, the state bank may agree to provide banking services as an agent for a depository institution.

A state bank that proposes to enter into an agency agreement under this section shall file with the department at least 60 days before the effective date of the agreement a request that the department approve the provision of the banking service. The request must include a

notice of intention to enter into an agency agreement with a depository institution;

description of the services proposed to be provided under the agency agreement; and

copy of the agency agreement

Except as provided by (d) of this section, the commissioner shall decide whether to approve a request submitted under (b) of this section and shall issue a decision within 60 days after receipt of the request. The department may ask for additional information after reviewing a request received under (b) of this section. If the department asks for additional information, the 60 days is calculated from the date the department receives the additional information.

When making its decision under (c) of this section, the department may consider the safety and soundness of the particular state bank and depository institution and whether providing the service is consistent with applicable federal and state law and with safe and sound banking practices.

Before approval under (c) or (f) of this section, the department shall give appropriate notice to the public of each request submitted to the department under (b) of this section.

If the department does not take action on a request submitted under (b) of this section within the time limit established in (c) of this section, the request is considered to have been approved by the department.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a state bank may not, under an agency agreement, provide by itself through an agent an activity that the state bank may not conduct under applicable state and federal law.

The department may order a state bank or another depository institution subject to this title to cease acting as an agent or principal under an agency agreement subject to this section if the department determines that the activity is inconsistent with safe and sound banking practices.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1996)

Sec. 06.05.280.
Fees connected with obtaining mortgage loans.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

A director, officer, or employee of a bank may not receive a fee or other compensation of any kind in connection with obtaining a mortgage loan from a bank, except for services actually rendered as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 20 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)